Hawaii, session 2026, SB3038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that paying incarcerated individuals meaningful wages leads to greatly reduced recidivism, provides incentive not to break the law to protect what the individuals have already earned, and allows a financial means and foundation for successful rehabilitation and reentry into society. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the department of corrections and rehabilitation to establish a five-year pilot program to employ and pay incarcerated individuals with fewer than five years left on their sentence the minimum wage; (2)  Require the department of corrections and rehabilitation to submit annual reports to the legislature for the duration of the program; and (3)  Appropriate funds. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the department of corrections and rehabilitation a five-year pilot program to employ and pay incarcerated individuals with fewer than five years left on their sentence the minimum wage. (b)  The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall contact participants annually for three years after the participant's release from incarceration to evaluate: (1)  The participant's status, including current employment and living situation; and (2)  Whether the financial assistance obtained from the pilot program helped the participant successfully reenter and reintegrate into society. (c)  The department of corrections and rehabilitation may contract with a research organization or program manager to carry out the purposes of this Act. (d)  The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations on the progress and outcomes of the program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and 2031. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of corrections and rehabilitation to establish a five-year pilot program to employ and pay incarcerated individuals with fewer than five years left on their sentence the minimum wage. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation for the purposes of this Act; provided that all moneys that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2029, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________